Rhode Island statutes. Title 22 General Assembly
Chapter 11 Joint Committee on Legislative Services

22-11-1.
Permanent committee — Composition.

There is created a permanent joint committee on legislative services consisting of the president and the minority leader of the senate, the majority and minority leaders from the house of representatives, and the speaker of the house of representatives. The members of the committee shall serve until their successors have been duly elected and qualified.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 181, art. 6, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 489, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 32.

22-11-2.
Officers.

The speaker of the house of representatives shall serve as chairperson of the joint committee and the president of the senate shall serve as vice-chairperson.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 181, art. 6, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 32.

22-11-3.
Functions.

It shall be exclusively the responsibility of the joint committee to act upon all administrative matters affecting the operation of the general assembly, including, but not limited to:

The preparation of the legislative payrolls;

The preparation of requests for the annual operating budget for the general assembly;

The control of house and senate appropriations, including expenditures of standing, select, and special committees of the general assembly, except those provided otherwise by law;

All printing for the general assembly and its members and staff including, but not limited to, stationery, bills and journals and covers for them, daily calendars, public laws, acts of a local and private nature, and resolutions;

The procuring of office space, supplies, equipment, and professional and technical assistants for the general assembly; and

The exclusive responsibility for the purchase or rental of and the installation, obtaining, upkeep, and maintenance of electronic voting devices and equipment incidental to the devices, and sound systems for the house of representatives and senate chambers, including, but not limited to, entering into contracts and agreements for the purchase, rental, installation, or maintenance of the equipment and procuring the necessary supplies for the systems.

In addition, the joint committee will have exclusive authority on office space allocations and maintenance and repair in this state capitol building for all agencies of government, except the offices of the governor and the offices of the secretary of state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 181, art. 6, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 201, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 196, § 2; P.L. 1974, ch. 198, art. 5, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 146, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 291, art. 11, § 1.

22-11-3.1.
Rules and regulations.

The joint committee on legislative services is authorized and empowered to adopt any rules and regulations that are deemed necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter, a copy of which rules and regulations shall be filed with the secretary of state and available for public inspection; provided, that each permanent and continuing office or agency within the legislative department, established by statute and to which funds are specifically appropriated, will maintain and be responsible for exercising its own internal financial and personnel controls. In the formation of these rules and regulations, the joint committee shall take into consideration and conform to, where practicable, existing policies governing financial and personnel practices within the executive branch of government.

The joint committee on legislative services is authorized and empowered to adopt rules and regulations, consistent with the rules of each house of the general assembly, designed to provide electronic services and products to its elected members and, incrementally, to make electronic services and products regarding its proceedings available to the citizens of this state. The joint committee on legislative services shall prioritize general assembly proceedings and legislative information to be made incrementally accessible in a timely manner, including:

A list of all members of the general assembly with their addresses and telephone numbers and all committees of the general assembly and their members;

The history and status of every bill introduced and amended in each current legislative session;

The current calendars of the house and the senate and of all legislative committees;

The text of every bill introduced and to be printed in the current legislative session, including the amended or substitute form of each bill, and the text of every bill as enacted;

The general laws;

The Rhode Island Constitution; and

The senate and house journals.

It shall be solely and exclusively within the discretion of the joint committee on legislative services, when providing access, to include and require, in written contracts for electronic services and products, provisions that:

Protect the security and integrity of the information system of the general assembly;

Limit any potential liability of the general assembly in providing public access to electronic services and products;

Ensure that access of non-disclosable information is prohibited;

Provide protection against intentional or accidental disclosure, modification, or destruction of records.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 99, § 8; P.L. 1988, ch. 489, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 377, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 72.

22-11-3.2.
Law revision director.

The joint committee on legislative services is authorized and empowered to appoint a law revision director in charge of law revision, who shall perform the duties as the joint committee on legislative services may prescribe in relation to law revision.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 153, § 3; P.L. 1988, ch. 489, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 354, § 21.

22-11-3.3.
Printing and binding of proceedings of general assembly.

The joint committee on legislative services shall, at the end of each session of the general assembly, cause to be published, with a proper index, a number of copies of the public laws not exceeding three thousand (3,000) that shall have been passed during the session, as compiled and edited by the law revision director of the joint committee on legislative services, to be distributed in the manner provided in §

43-2-5

. It shall also cause to be published, with a proper index, a number of copies of the acts of a local and private nature and resolutions not exceeding one thousand (1,000) that shall have been passed at the session, as compiled and edited by the law revision director of the joint committee on legislative services, excluding resolutions of congratulation, commendation, and sympathy to be distributed in the manner provided in §

43-2-5

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 201, § 2; P.L. 1973, ch. 269, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 304, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

22-11-3.2

; P.L. 1985, ch. 153, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 489, § 2.

22-11-3.4.
Duties of the law revision director.

In addition to other duties assigned to the law revision director, he or she shall rearrange, rephrase, and consolidate the public laws and acts and resolves of the general assembly so that redundancies may be avoided, obsolete enactments eliminated, contradictions reconciled, omissions supplied, and imperfections cured. The law revision director has no authority either to change the law or to alter the substance of the statutes but shall alert the general assembly annually to specific changes, which may be required. In addition, a report shall be filed annually with the general assembly which shall indicate which sections of the general laws at the previous session had more than one amendment and displaying a copy of the final version of the statute on the first legislative day of the next subsequent session of the general assembly.

The law revision director shall, by February 1, 2020, file a report with the general assembly proposing amendments to those sections of the general laws that do not use appropriate disability language as required by §

43-3-7.1

. The report shall also include a list of those statutes for which amendments are not being proposed pursuant to §

43-3-7.1

because the director had determined that such amendments could alter the intent of the statute. The report shall be prepared after consultation with the governor’s commission on disabilities.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 153, § 3; P.L. 1999, ch. 354, § 21; P.L. 2019, ch. 40, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 53, § 1.

22-11-3.5.
Revision of statutes — Gender neutrality.

The law revision director is authorized and empowered to amend statutes for the purpose of making statutory language gender neutral.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 378, § 2.

22-11-4.
Employees.

To accomplish the purposes of this chapter, the joint committee is authorized to employ a chief legislative clerk and any other legislative assistants, including clerical assistants, that it deems necessary, and to fix the rates of compensation of these employees.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 181, art. 6, § 1.

22-11-5.
Quarters.

The permanent joint committee on legislative services shall be provided with suitable offices in the state house for its staff.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 181, art. 6, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 489, § 2.

22-11-6.
Annual appropriation.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate the sum as shall be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 181, art. 6, § 1.